Hawaii statutes.
[§302A-127] Board of education;
senate advice and consent. In determining whether to confirm the
governor's nominees to the board, the senate shall consider the combination of
abilities, breadth of experiences, and characteristics of the board, as a whole,
that will best serve the diverse interests and needs of the students and their
families, the education system in Hawaii from early childhood through higher
education, and the public libraries. Such considerations shall include but not
be limited to reflecting the diversity of the student population, geographical
representation, and a broad representation of education-related stakeholders.
[L 2011, c 5, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next